New York, session 2025-2026, A6722.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (u) of subdivision 4 of section 510.10 of the 2 criminal procedure law, as added by section 2 of subpart B of part UU of 3 chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended and a new paragraph (v) is 4 added to read as follows: 5 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 6 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 7 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 8 or 9 (v) aggravated cruelty to animals as defined in section three hundred 10 fifty-three-a of the agriculture and markets law. 11 § 2. Subparagraph (xxi) of paragraph (b) of subdivision 1 of section 12 530.20 of the criminal procedure law, as added by section 4 of subpart C 13 of part UU of chapter 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended and a new 14 subparagraph (xxii) is added to read as follows: 15 (xxi) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined 16 in subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale 17 of a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal 18 law[.]; or 19 (xxii) aggravated cruelty to animals as defined in section three 20 hundred fifty-three-a of the agriculture and markets law. 21 § 3. Paragraph (u) of subdivision 4 of section 530.40 of the criminal 22 procedure law, as added by section 4 of subpart B of part UU of chapter 23 56 of the laws of 2022, is amended and a new paragraph (v) is added to 24 read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03829-01-5 A. 6722 2 1 (u) criminal possession of a weapon in the third degree as defined in 2 subdivision three of section 265.02 of the penal law or criminal sale of 3 a firearm to a minor as defined in section 265.16 of the penal law[.]; 4 or 5 (v) aggravated cruelty to animals as defined in section three hundred 6 fifty-three-a of the agriculture and markets law. 7 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.